District of Columbia statutes.
19-305

Distribution of surplus after payment to surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner.

The surplus, above the share of the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner, or the whole surplus, when there is no surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner, descends and is distributed as provided by this chapter and by section 19-701 .

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 698, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-79, § 5(n), 53 DCR 1035

History

1981 Ed., § 19-305.
1973 Ed., § 19-305.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 16-79, in the section heading, substituted “surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner” for “surviving spouse”; and substituted “surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner” for “surviving spouse” throughout section.

Effect of Amendments